Idaho statutes. Title 70 WATERCOURSES AND PORT DISTRICTS
Chapter 13
PORT DISTRICTS — REVISION OF COMMISSIONER DISTRICTS

Sec.

§ 70-1301. Revision of commissioner districts authorized.

The commission by resolution may, and upon petition signed by not less than two hundred fifty (250) electors residing in the area to be redistricted, shall, re-establish the boundaries of the commissioner districts in that portion of the port district which is in the county in which the district was initially formed, so that each such commissioner district shall comprise as nearly as possible one-third (1/3) of the population of so much of the port district as is within such county, provided that no county voting precinct shall be divided by the boundary lines of a commissioner district.

§ 70-1302. Meeting for revision public — Notice.

The revision of boundary lines provided for in this act shall be made only at a meeting of the port commission with attendance of all of the members of the commission, which meeting shall be public. The port commission shall give notice of such meeting by publishing the same in a daily newspaper of general circulation within the port district, or if there be no such daily newspaper, then in a weekly newspaper of general circulation within such port district. Such notice shall be published not less than once per week for two (2) consecutive weeks, the date of the first publication to be not more than twenty (20) days prior to the date fixed for such meeting. Such notice shall state the time, place and purpose of the meeting.

§ 70-1303. Change not to affect existing terms of office.

Any change of boundary lines provided for in this act shall not affect the terms of commissioners already in office at the time the change is made.